Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-993
Medical parole; protocol.

The Division of Medicaid and Long-Term Care of the Department of Health and Human Services shall, in consultation with the Department of Correctional Services, develop a protocol to assist an individual who is eligible for medical parole pursuant to section 83-1,110.02 to apply for and receive benefits under the Medical Assistance Act.

Laws 2019, LB726, § 2.